Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-102 Definitions. As used in
this article:

"Approved continuing education
course" means a course approved by the commissioner following receipt of
recommendations from insurance professionals.

"Approved course provider" means an
individual or entity that is approved to offer continuing education courses
pursuant to article 9A.

"Authorized insurer" means an insurer
holding a valid certificate of authority to transact an insurance business in the
state in which the subject resident is located or in which the insurance
contract will be performed.

"Business entity" means an
association, corporation, individual, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, partnership, person, or other legal entity.

"Credit hour" means the value assigned
to an approved continuing education course that is equivalent to at least fifty
minutes of classroom instruction.

"Exempt
commercial purchaser" means any person purchasing commercial insurance which, at the
time of placement, employs or retains a qualified risk manager to negotiate
insurance coverage; and has paid aggregate nationwide commercial property and
casualty insurance premiums in excess of $100,000 in the immediately preceding
twelve months. The person shall possess a net worth in excess of $20,000,000;
generate annual revenues in excess of $50,000,000; employ more than five
hundred full-time or full-time equivalent employees per individual insured or
be a member of an affiliated group employing more than 1,000 employees in the
aggregate; be a not-for-profit organization or public entity generating annual
budgeted expenditures of at least $30,000,000; or be a municipality with a
population in excess of 50,000 persons. Effective January 1, 2015, and
every five years thereafter, the amount of net worth, annual revenues, and
budgeted expenditures shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage change for
that five-year period in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the federal Department of Labor.

"Home state"
means, with respect
to an insured, the state in which an insured maintains the insured's principal place of business or, in the case of an
individual, the state in which the individual maintains the individual's principal residence; provided that if one hundred per
cent of the insured risk is located out of the state where the insured
maintains the insured's principal place of
business or the state where the individual maintains the principal residence,
the home state shall be the state where the greatest percentage of the insured's taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

"Home state" means, with respect to
an insured, the state in which an insured maintains the insured's principal
place of business or, in the case of a surplus lines broker, the state in which
the surplus lines broker maintains the surplus lines broker's principal
residence or principal place of business and is licensed to act as a surplus
lines broker; provided that if one hundred per cent of the insured risk is
located out of the state where the insured maintains the insured's principal
place of business or the state where the individual maintains the principal
residence, the home state shall be the state where the greatest percentage of
the insured's taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

"Home state of affiliated group" means the home state of the member of the affiliated group
that has the largest percentage of premium attributed to it under an insurance
contract that has more than one insured from the affiliated group listed as
named insureds on a single unauthorized insurance contract.

"Home state of group insurance" means the home state of the group policyholder who pays
one hundred per cent of the premium from the policyholder's own funds. When the group policyholder does not pay one
hundred per cent of the premium from the policyholder's own funds, the term "home
state of group insurance" means the home
state of the group member.

"Inactive" means that the authority
of a license issued by the commissioner is not in effect.

"Independently procured insurance" means insurance obtained by an insured directly from an
unauthorized insurer as permitted by the laws of the insured's home state.

"Individual" means a natural person
or a business entity.

"License" means a document issued by
the commissioner authorizing a person to act as a surplus lines broker as
specified in the document. The license itself shall not create any authority,
actual, apparent, or inherent, in the holder to represent or commit an insurer.

"Licensee" means a surplus lines
broker licensed under this article.

"Multi-state risk"
means a risk covered by an unauthorized insurer with insured exposures in more
than one state.

"Principal place of business" means, with respect to determining the home state of the
insured:

(1) The state where the
insured maintains the insured's headquarters and where the insured's high-level
officers direct, control, and coordinate the business activities;

(2) If the insured's high-level officers direct, control, and
coordinate the business activities in more than one state, the state in which
the greatest percentage of the insured's taxable premium for that insurance
contract is allocated; or

(3) If the insured maintains the insured's headquarters or the
insured's high-level officers direct, control, and coordinate the business
activities outside any state, the state in which the greatest percentage of the
insured's taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

"Principal residence" means, with respect to determining the home state of the individual
insured:

(1) The state where the
individual insured resides for the greatest number of days during a calendar
year; or

(2) If the insured's principal residence is located outside any
state, the state in which the greatest percentage of the insured's taxable
premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

"Single state risk"
means a risk with insured exposures in only one state.

"Surplus lines broker" means any
person licensed under section 431:8-310 to place insurance on risks resident,
located, or to be performed in this State with unauthorized insurers.

"Surplus lines insurance" means any
property and casualty insurance on risks procured from or placed with an
unauthorized insurer under the laws of the insured's home state. Surplus lines
insurance, when this State is the home state of the insured, shall be in
accordance with part III of this article.

"Unauthorized insurer" means an
insurer not holding a valid certificate of authority to transact an insurance
business in the state in which the subject resident is located or in which the
insurance contract will be performed. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c
195, §18; am L 2002, c 155, §13; am L 2011, c 68, §5; am L 2011, c 68, §5; am L
2012, c 66, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next